Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.800

Rule making—Licensure requirements.

(1) By July 1, 2024, the department and the examining board of psychology shall adopt emergency rules to implement changes to licensing requirements to remove barriers to entering and remaining in the health care workforce and to streamline and shorten the credentialing process. Pursuant to RCW 34.05.350, the legislature finds that the rules adopted under this section are necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare and observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to the public interest. The disciplining authorities shall, therefore, adopt the rules required under this section as emergency rules.

(2) By July 1, 2025, the department and the examining board of psychology shall adopt permanent rules to implement changes to licensing requirements to remove barriers to entering and remaining in the health care workforce and to streamline and shorten the credentialing process.

[ 2023 c 425 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.